New Jersey, session 221, S3451.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 23 of P.L.1984, c205 (C.45:5B-23) is amended to read as follows: 23.  An applicant for a license to teach cosmetology and hairstyling shall submit to the board satisfactory evidence that he: a.     Is of good moral character; b.    Is at least 18 years of age; c.     Does not have a communicable, contagious or infectious disease; d.    Has successfully completed high school or successfully passed the examination developed by the General Education Development (GED) Testing Service; e.     Holds a cosmetologist-hairstylist license issued by the board; f.     Has successfully completed a teacher training course, the curriculum for which shall be established by the board pursuant to regulation, consisting of 600 hours of instruction in the practice and theory of teaching conducted at a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling in this State or a school of cosmetology and hairstyling or beauty culture licensed in another state or foreign country which, in the opinion of the board, offers a curriculum which is substantially similar to that offered at licensed schools within this State; g.    Has successfully completed a 30-hour teaching methods course conducted by a college approved by the Commission on Higher Education and recognized by the board or a substantially equivalent teaching methods course conducted by a college in another state which is approved by the higher education authorities of that state and recognized by the board; h.    Has attained six months' employment experience in a licensed shop within this State which may be obtained prior to, at the same time as, or subsequent to the period during which the applicant is attending the teacher training course offered by a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling of this State or has attained six months' licensed employment in another state or foreign country; and i.     Has successfully completed an examination conducted by the board. (cf: P.L.2009, c.162, s.21) 2.    Section 8 of P.L.1999, c.19 (C.45:11-60) is amended to read as follows: 8.    To be eligible for licensure as a massage and bodywork therapist, an applicant shall be of good moral character and submit to the board satisfactory evidence of: a.     Successful completion of a minimum of [500] 600 hours in class study in the field of massage and bodywork therapies approved by the board; b.    Successful completion of a written examination approved by the board, which shall consider relevant education, training and practical work experience, to determine the applicant's competence to practice massage and bodywork therapies; and c.     Coverage by a professional liability insurance policy in a minimum amount of $1,000,000 per occurrence and $3,000,000 aggregate per policy year. (cf: P.L.2019, c.405, s.1) 3.    (New section) Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L. 1968, c. 410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the New Jersey State Board of Cosmetology and Hairstyling and the New Jersey Board of Massage and Bodywork Therapy may adopt, immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, such regulations as they deem necessary to implement the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 545 days from the date of filing.  The boards shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.